Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. NEW SECTION . 91A.5B Treatment of adoptive parent employees. 1. For purposes of this section, âadoptionâ means the permanent placement in this state of a child by the department of health and human services, by a licensed agency under chapter 238, by an agency that meets the provisions of the interstate compact in section 232.158, or by a person making an independent placement according to the provisions of chapter 600. 2. An employer shall treat an employee who chooses to adopt a child up to six years of age in the same manner as an employee who is the biological parent of a newborn child for purposes of employment policies, benefits, and protections for the first year of the adoption. House File 248, p. 2 3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, an employee shall not be entitled to disability leave without a qualifying disability under an employerâs disability policies. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 248, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2025 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor